District of Columbia statutes.
8-101

Each day of a violation of or failure to comply with this part or a regulation promulgated pursuant to this part shall constitute a separate offense, and the penalties set forth in §§  8-101.05c, 8-101.05d, 8-101.05e, and 8-101.05f shall be applicable to each separate offense.

History

Mar. 15, 1985, D.C. Law 5-165, § 5b
as added Sept. 9, 2014, D.C. Law 20-135, § 101(b), 61 DCR 6767